Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3,120
Financial Institution Data Match Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3,120 to 77-3,127 shall be known and may be cited as the Financial Institution Data Match Act.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 24.